Illinois, session 104th, HB628.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Torture Inquiry and Relief 5Commission Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (775 ILCS 40/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Illinois Torture Inquiry and Relief Commission Act.9(Source: P.A. 96-223, eff. 8-10-09.)